Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 4. Management.

§79-29-401.
Management of a limited liability company by a manager or managers.

The certificate of formation or the operating agreement may delegate responsibility for managing a limited liability company to or among one or more managers to the extent provided therein.Managers may also serve as officers to the extent provided in the operating agreement.

Managers need not be residents of this state or members of the limited liability company.The certificate of formation or the operating agreement may prescribe other qualifications for managers.

The number of managers shall be fixed by or in the manner provided in the certificate of formation or the operating agreement.The number of managers may be increased or decreased by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the certificate of formation or the operating agreement.

Managers shall be elected by the members.

Any vacancy occurring in the office of manager shall be filled by the vote of the members.

All managers or any lesser number may be removed in the manner provided in the certificate of formation or the operating agreement.All managers or any lesser number may be removed with or without cause by the vote of the members required to elect such manager or managers.

Any action required or permitted to be taken by the managers of a limited liability company may be taken upon a majority vote of the managers.

An operating agreement may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any manager or class or group of managers, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote.

Meetings of managers may be held by means of telephone or other communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can speak to and hear each other, and participation in a meeting pursuant to this subsection shall constitute presence in person at the meeting.

The managers may take action on any matter that is to be voted on, consented to or approved by managers without a meeting, and without a vote with not less than one (1) but not more than ten (10) days’ prior notice to all the managers if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the managers having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all managers entitled to vote thereon were present and voted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-401 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to management of a limited liability company by a manager or managers. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-402.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-402. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-402 was entitled: General standards of conduct for a manager. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-403.

§79-29-403.
Reliance on reports and information.

A member, manager, officer or liquidating trustee of a limited liability company shall be fully protected in relying in good faith upon:

The records of the limited liability company; and upon

Information, opinions, reports or statements, including, information, opinions, reports or statements as to the value and amount of the assets, liabilities, profits or losses of the limited liability company, or the value and amount of assets, reserves, contracts, agreements or other undertakings that would be sufficient to pay claims and obligations of the limited liability company or to make reasonable provision to pay such claims and obligations, or any other facts pertinent to the existence and amount of assets from which distributions might properly be paid which are presented by:

Another manager of the limited liability company;

A member of the limited liability company;

A liquidating trustee of the limited liability company;

An officer of the limited liability company;

An employee of the limited liability company;

Committees of the limited liability company, members or managers; or

Any other person as to matters the member, manager, officer or liquidating trustee reasonably believes is within such other person’s professional or expert competence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-403 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to limitation of liability of members and managers. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-405.
Delegation of rights and powers to manage.

The manager of a limited liability company has the power and authority to delegate to one or more other persons the manager’s rights and powers to manage and control the business and affairs of the limited liability company, including to delegate to agents, officers and employees of:(a) a member, (b) a manager or (c) the limited liability company, and to delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons.

Such delegation as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall not cause the manager to cease to be a manager of the limited liability company or cause the person to whom any such rights and powers have been delegated to be a manager of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-407.
Resignation of manager.

An operating agreement may provide that a manager may resign as a manager of a limited liability company at the time or upon the happening of events specified in an operating agreement and in accordance with the operating agreement.An operating agreement may provide that a manager shall not have the right to resign as a manager of a limited liability company.A manager may resign as a manager of a limited liability company at any time by giving written notice to the members and other managers.If the resignation of a manager violates an operating agreement, in addition to any remedies otherwise available under applicable law, a limited liability company may recover from the resigning manager damages for breach of the operating agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise payable to the resigning manager.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.